src/fst/morphology/stems/interjections.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! Interjections
! =============

LEXICON INTERJ
+Interj:%> # ;

LEXICON Interjection
ah                                  INTERJ ;
aha                                 INTERJ ;
amen                                INTERJ ; ! Well, XXX
buoris	                            INTERJ ; 
dale                                INTERJ ;
dehe                                INTERJ ;
dejga                               INTERJ ;
eloi                                INTERJ ;
fij                                 INTERJ ;
fijdejga                            INTERJ ;
fissj                               INTERJ ;
fuoj                                INTERJ ;
ge                                  INTERJ ;
halleluja                           INTERJ ;
hello                               INTERJ ;
hivás                               INTERJ ;
hmm                            INTERJ ;
hosianna                            INTERJ ;
huh                                 INTERJ ;
hurráh                              INTERJ ;
há                                  INTERJ ;
hå                                  INTERJ ;
håhåj                               INTERJ ;
håj                                 INTERJ ;
hærrá% jiemmilam:hærrá% jiemmilam   INTERJ ;
hærrá% jiesstánam:hærrá% jiesstánam INTERJ ;
hærrá% jiesstás:hærrá% jiesstás     INTERJ ;
jiekkur                             INTERJ ;
jiemmilam                           INTERJ ;
jiesstánam                          INTERJ ;
jiesstás 			    			INTERJ ;
juo 			    				INTERJ ;
!koum                                INTERJ ;
lema                                INTERJ ;
!sabaktani                           INTERJ ;
vuoj                                INTERJ ;
vuoj-vuoj                           INTERJ ;
åhå                                 INTERJ ;
ånu                                 INTERJ ;
æææ                                 INTERJ ;
várssa								INTERJ ; !lettere svordom, grundstøm s 1377
